Nevada, session 83, AB206.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
1 Section 1. NRS 679A.210 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
679A.210 Prohibited provisions in policy of liability
insurance relating to costs of defense, legal costs and fees and
other expenses for claims. Notwithstanding any other provision
-
*AB206*

– 2 –
of law, an insurer, including, without limitation, an insurer listed in
NRS 679A.160, shall not issue or renew a policy of liability
insurance that contains a provision that:
1. Reduces the limit of liability stated in the policy by the costs
of defense, legal costs and fees and other expenses for claims; or
2. Otherwise limits the availability of coverage for the costs of
defense, legal costs and fees and other expenses for claims.
H
-
*AB206*